Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-319
Zoning regulations;
provide for administration and enforcement.

All
airport zoning regulations adopted under the
Airport Zoning Act shall provide for the administration and enforcement
of such regulations by an administrative agency which may be an agency created
by such regulations or any official, board, or
other existing agency of the political subdivision adopting the regulations. In the case of airport zoning regulations
adopted by a joint airport zoning board, each of the political subdivisions which
participated in the creation of the joint airport zoning board shall create or designate an official
or an administrative agency to administer and enforce the airport zoning regulations
within its respective zoning jurisdiction. The duties of any official or administrative
agency designated pursuant to the
act shall include that of reviewing
and acting upon all applications for permits under the airport zoning regulations, but
such agency shall not have or exercise any of the powers herein delegated
to the board of adjustment. In
no event shall such official or administrative agency be or include any member
of the board of adjustment.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 9, p. 687;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 14.